District of Columbia statutes.
38-1112

State consent requirement satisfied.

The enactment of §§ 38-1107 and 38-1109 shall, as respects the District of Columbia, be deemed to satisfy any requirement of state consent contained in any of the laws or provisions of law referred to in such sections.

Nov. 7, 1966, Pub. L. 89-791, title I, § 112
June 20, 1968, 82 Stat. 242, Pub. L. 90-354, § 1
Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1935, Pub. L. 91-650, title IV, § 401(c)
1981 Ed., § 31-1412.
1973 Ed., § 31-1612.